Connecticut, session 2026, SB00211.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the sum of five million dollars be appropriated to the office of
the Attorney General from the General Fund, for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2027, to: (1) Expand said office's capacity to investigate and
enforce conduct related to health insurance practices by health carriers
that impact access to health care, inflate consumer costs or violate
federal or state law; and (2) require that said office submit a report to
the joint standing committees of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to insurance and public health, not later
than February 1, 2028, summarizing any such investigation or
enforcement action taken by said office.